Missouri, session 2026, HB2148.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 34.040, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 34.040, to read as follows:
34.040. 1. All purchases in excess of ten thousand dollars shall be based on
competitive bids, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.
2. On any purchase where the estimated expenditure shall be one hundred thousand
dollars or over, except as provided in subsection 6 of this section, the commissioner of
administration shall:
(1) Advertise for bids in at least two daily newspapers of general circulation in such
places as are most likely to reach prospective bidders and may advertise in at least two weekly
minority newspapers and may provide such information through an electronic medium
available to the general public at least five days before bids for such purchases are to be
opened. Other methods of advertisement, which may include minority business purchase
councils, however, may be adopted by the commissioner of administration when such other
methods are deemed more advantageous for the supplies to be purchased;
(2) Post a notice of the proposed purchase in his or her office; and
(3) Solicit bids by mail or other reasonable method generally available to the public
from prospective suppliers. All bids for such supplies shall be mailed or delivered to the
office of the commissioner of administration so as to reach such office before the time set for
opening bids.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2148 2
3. The contract shall be let to the lowest and best bidder. The commissioner of
administration shall have the right to reject any or all bids and advertise for new bids, or
purchase the required supplies on the open market if they can be so purchased at a better
price. When bids received pursuant to this section are unreasonable or unacceptable as to
terms and conditions, noncompetitive, or the low bid exceeds available funds and it is
determined in writing by the commissioner of administration that time or other circumstances
will not permit the delay required to resolicit competitive bids, a contract may be negotiated
pursuant to this section, provided that each responsible bidder who submitted such bid under
the original solicitation is notified of the determination and is given a reasonable opportunity
to modify their bid and submit a best and final bid to the state. In cases where the bids
received are noncompetitive or the low bid exceeds available funds, the negotiated price shall
be lower than the lowest rejected bid of any responsible bidder under the original solicitation.
4. The director of the department of revenue shall follow bidding procedures as
contained in this chapter and may promulgate rules necessary to establish such procedures.
No points shall be awarded on a request for proposal for a contract license office to a bidder
for a return-to-the-state provision offer.
5. All bids shall be based on standard specifications wherever such specifications
have been approved by the commissioner of administration. The commissioner of
administration shall make rules governing the delivery, inspection, storage and distribution of
all supplies so purchased and governing the manner in which all claims for supplies delivered
shall be submitted, examined, approved and paid. The commissioner shall determine the
amount of bond or deposit and the character thereof which shall accompany bids or contracts.
6. The department of natural resources may, without the approval of the
commissioner of administration required pursuant to this section, enter into contracts of up
to five hundred thousand dollars to abate illegal waste tire sites pursuant to section 260.276
when the director of the department determines that urgent action is needed to protect public
health, safety, natural resources or the environment. The department shall follow bidding
procedures pursuant to this section and may promulgate rules necessary to establish such
procedures. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 1999, shall be invalid
and void.

HB 2148 3
7. The commissioner of administration and other agencies to which the state
purchasing law applies shall not contract for goods or services with a vendor if the vendor or
an affiliate of the vendor makes sales at retail of tangible personal property or for the purpose
of storage, use, or consumption in this state but fails to collect and properly pay the tax as
provided in chapter 144. For the purposes of this section, "affiliate of the vendor" shall mean
any person or entity that is controlled by or is under common control with the vendor, whether
through stock ownership or otherwise.
8. The commissioner of administration may hold reverse auctions to procure
merchandise, supplies, raw materials, or finished goods if price is the primary factor in
evaluating bids, excluding items in section 34.047. The office of administration shall
promulgate rules regarding the handling of the reverse auction process.
9. If any bid issued under this section is canceled, the issuing entity shall, in the
same manner as otherwise required by this section, publish:
(1) A justification for the cancellation;
(2) Available information about any plans to reissue the bid and associated
timeframes for the reissuance;
(3) Any plans to include the canceled bid within another bid; and
(4) Currently available bids that are similar in nature to the canceled bid.
[9.] 10. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2019, shall be invalid
and void.
✔